Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1288.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Veterans Viaduct.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds that:(1) The viaduct was originally constructed in 1930 to eliminate the need to cross the Pennsylvania and Lehigh Valley Railroads to get to town.(2) The viaduct allowed motorists to bypass the coal trains that frequently obstructed access to town.(3) The viaduct was rebuilt in 2003 and continues to serve as an important link that connects people to the community.(4) The viaduct reflects the role veterans played to unite and strengthen our Commonwealth and nation during both peace and conflict.123456789101112131415161718 (5) Veterans are courageous, selfless and have made profound sacrifices in service to our country.(6) Veterans place the safety and freedom of others above their own.(7) The viaduct will stand as a reminder and symbol of gratitude, respect and the enduring legacy of veterans who have answered the call to serve.(8) The Commonwealth and this nation are indebted to veterans for their bravery, heroism and sacrifices in protecting freedom and liberty both at home and abroad.(9) It is with the highest level of gratitude and respect that the communities of Mount Carmel Borough and Mount Carmel Township request this designation to honor past, present and future veterans.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 42251, carrying Pennsylvania Route 61 over the Shamokin Creek in Mount Carmel Borough, Northumberland County, is designated the Veterans Viaduct.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1288PN1605 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223